Oklahoma, session 2026, SB451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 452.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 452.5. A. The officials and employees of all entities


of the state are hereby directed to aid, assist and cooperate fully


with the Legislative Service Bureau in its performance of all audits


and other functions.


B. All proposed legislation requested by an agency of this


state shall include an agency request statement. The statement


shall designate which agency requested the legislation, the name of


the primary contact of the agency, and a brief description of the


need for the legislation as provided by the agency. No such


statement shall be required for proposed legislation that is not

Req. No. 1414 Page 1


requested by a state agency or an employee, lobbyist, or


representative of the agency.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1414 RD 1/19/2025 5:36:39 AM







































Req. No. 1414 Page 2